src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
# Buryaad morphological analyser                      !
INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF BURYAAD.

# Definitions for Multichar_Symbols

* +N	      Noun 
* +V	      Verb
* +A	      Adjective
* +Adv      Adverb
* +Pcle      Particles (Probably adverbs, look into this)
* +CC	      Conjunction
* +CS	      Subjunction
* +Interj   Interjection
* +Pron     Pronoun
* +Prop     Propernoun
* +Num      Numaral
* +Det      Determiner (Demonstrative?)
* +Po      Postposition
* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©

* +Prs     Present
* +Fut     Future
* +Prt     Preterite
* +Prf     Perfect
* +Ind     Indicative
* +Imp     Imperative
* +Cond    Conditional
* +Opt     Optative
* +Vol     Voluntative
* +Dur     Durative
* +Term     Terminative
* +Conf     Conf

* +Sg1     first person singular
* +Sg2     second person singular
* +Sg3     third person singular
* +Pl1     first person plural
* +Pl2     second person plural
* +Pl3     third person plural

* +Inf     Infinitive
* +Pos     Positive
* +Neg     Negative

* +TV     Transitive
* +IV      Intransitive

* +Sg      Singular
* +Pl      Plural

* +Nom     Nominative
* +Acc     Accusative
* +Gen     Genitive
* +Abl     Ablative
* +Dat     Dative
* +Ins     Instrumental
* +Com     Comitative
* +Ord     Ordinal
* +Presc    Prescriptive mood

* +AgPrc   
* +AgConstPrc   
* +DualPrc      
* +FutPrc	      
* +HabPrc	      
* +ImpfPrc      
* +PassPrc      
* +PrfPrc       
* +PotPrc	      
* +PrsPrc	      
* +ResPrc	      

* +ConMod    
* +ConImpf    
* +ConPrf    
* +ConCond    
* +ConConc    
* +ConTerm    
* +ConCntmp    
* +ConAbtmp    
* +ConFin    
* +ConIntnt    
* +ConSucc    
* +ConCmp    

* +PxSg1   first person singular possessive
* +PxSg2   second person singular possessive
* +PxSg3   third person singular possessive
* +PxPl1   first person plural possessive
* +PxPl2   second person plural possessive
* +PxPl3   third person plural possessive
* +Px3   third person plural possessive

# Semantic tags
* +Sem/Mal    

# Other tags
To be properly organised

* %{A%}   letter class 
* %{D%}   letter class 
* %{G%}   letter class 
* %{I%}   letter class 
* %{J%}   letter class 
* %{U%}   letter class 
* %{V%}   letter class 
* %{Ө%}   letter class 
* %{Y%}   kept after Cns, deleted after Vow

* а2 я2 м2  these are а and я in Russian loanwords that do not weaken to ых

* %^END   we do the mhr trick to harmonise twolc and lexc

## Usage tags

* +Use/NG   Do not generate 

## Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc):
* **»7**:  Literal »
* **«7**:  Literal «
```
 %[%>%]  - Literal >
 %[%<%]  - Literal <
```

## Flag diacritics
We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:
|  @P.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @D.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @C.NeedNoun@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.
|  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  @D.CmpPref.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
|  @D.CmpLast.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering R
|  @D.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.
|  @U.Cap.Obl@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @U.Cap.Opt@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

Key lexicon

**LEXICON Root ** is where it all starts, with these lexica:

* Noun ;				   
* urj-Cyrl-ProperNouns ; 
* bxr-Propernouns ;	   
* Verb ;				   
* Adjective ;			   
* Adverb ;			   
* Subjunction ;		   
* Interjection ;		   
* Pronoun ;			   
* Propernoun ;			   
* Postposition ;		    
* Particles ;		    , these should rather be adverbs
* Punctuation ;		   
* Symbols     ;		   
* Conjunction ;		   
* Numeral ;		    
* Abbreviation ;		    

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-bxr/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>

---
